District of Columbia statutes.
31-3704

Loss ratio standards.

Medicare supplement policies shall return to policyholders benefits which are reasonable in relation to the premium charged. The Mayor shall issue reasonable regulations to establish minimum standards for loss ratios of Medicare supplement policies on the basis of incurred claims experience, or incurred health care expenses where coverage is provided by a health maintenance organization on a service rather than reimbursement basis, and earned premiums in accordance with accepted actuarial principles and practices.

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 5, 39 DCR 5825
1981 Ed., § 35-2614.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3701.